Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.025

Humane societies—Animal control officers.

Trustees of humane societies incorporated pursuant to RCW 16.52.020 may appoint society members to act as animal control officers. The trustee appointments shall be in writing. The appointment shall be effective in a particular county only if an appointee obtains written authorization from the superior court of the county in which the appointee seeks to enforce this chapter. To obtain judicial authorization, an appointee seeking judicial authorization on or after June 9, 1994, shall provide evidence satisfactory to the judge that the appointee has successfully completed training which has prepared the appointee to assume the powers granted to animal control officers pursuant to RCW 16.52.015. The trustees shall review appointments every three years and may revoke an appointment at any time by filing a certified revocation with the superior court that approved the appointment. Authorizations shall not exceed three years or trustee termination, whichever occurs first. To qualify for reappointment when a term expires on or after June 9, 1994, the officer shall obtain training or satisfy the court that the officer has sufficient experience to exercise the powers granted to animal control officers pursuant to RCW 16.52.015.

[ 1994 c 261 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1994 c 261: See note following RCW 16.52.011.